California statutes. Insurance Code
 managers, officers, and directors, if any, of the limited liability company. Notification to the commissioner shall be sent within 30 days of the date that the licensed limited liability company learns of a change of its members who own 10 percent or more of the membership interests of the limited liability company and of the managers, officers, and directors, if any, of the limited liability company.

(c) The commissioner may require the application or notice or both to also disclose additional information to determine whether the applicant or licensee is in compliance with Section 1668.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 627, Sec. 6.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1658.

Each application filed by a natural person for a license shall contain the residence address, the principal business address, and the mailing address of the applicant. The application shall also contain the e-mail address to which the applicant wants the commissioner to direct all license-related correspondence. Each application for an organization license shall contain the principal business address and the mailing address of the applicant. The application shall also contain the e-mail address to which the applicant wants the commissioner to direct all license-related correspondence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 254, Sec. 5.   (AB 800)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1661.

Whenever an organization licensed as a life agent, property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, personal lines broker-agent, or limited lines automobile insurance agent desires to change, remove, or add to the natural person or persons who are to transact insurance under authority of its license pursuant to Section 1656, it shall immediately file an application or notice on a form prescribed by the commissioner with the commissioner for an endorsement changing its license accordingly. The form shall be submitted by a means of electronic service approved by the commissioner. The commissioner shall require that the qualifying examination provided by this code be taken by any natural person named by the organization to exercise its agency or brokerage powers
 who would be required to take and pass the qualifying examination. That natural person or persons and the organization are in all other respects subject to the provisions of this chapter and the insurance laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 566, Sec. 4.   (AB 943)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bonds [1662. - 1665.]

1662.

A property broker-agent, a casualty broker-agent, and a personal lines broker-agent shall, prior to acting in the capacity of an insurance broker, file with the commissioner and continuously maintain in force the bond required by this article. Any authority to act as broker shall automatically terminate immediately upon there being no bond in force.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 14.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1663.

Such bond shall be duly executed by an admitted surety insurer, shall be continuous in form, and shall be in favor of the people of the State of California.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1665.

The bond of a property broker-agent and a casualty broker-agent shall be in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Individuals and organizations licensed for both property and casualty are only required to obtain one ten-thousand-dollar ($10,000) bond to act as a broker. The bond shall be contingent on the accounting by the property broker-agent or the casualty broker-agent to any person requesting insurance, for moneys or premiums collected by the property broker-agent or the casualty broker-agent when acting as a broker for insurance other than life.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 16.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. License Qualifications [1666. - 1672.]

1666.

Upon the filing of an application for a license in accordance with Article 4 of this chapter, the commissioner may make an investigation and require the filing of supplementary documents, affidavits, and statements as may be necessary to obtain a full disclosure of information as will aid the commissioner in determining whether the prerequisites for the license have been met. If the applicant makes a showing satisfactory to the commissioner that the applicant meets all prerequisites, the commissioner, if the applicant is eligible, may issue a certificate of convenience, and upon the applicant meeting any applicable examination requirements may issue a permanent license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 7.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1666.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner shall at the time of issuance or renewal of any license under this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831) require that any license applicant or licensee provide its federal employer identification number if the license applicant or licensee is a partnership, or the social security number of the license applicant or licensee for all others, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) The commissioner shall require either a social security number or an individual taxpayer identification number if the license
 applicant or licensee is an individual applying for or renewing a license under this chapter.

(b) A license applicant or licensee failing to provide the federal identification number, social security number, or individual taxpayer identification number shall be reported by the commissioner to the Franchise Tax Board and, if failing to provide after notification pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 19528 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall be subject to the penalty provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 19528 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) (1) The commissioner shall, upon request of the Franchise Tax Board, furnish to the board all of the following information with respect to every license applicant or licensee:

(A) License applicant’s or licensee’s name.

(B) Address or addresses of record.

(C) Federal employer identification number if the entity is a partnership or owner’s name and social security number for all others.

(D) Type of license.

(E) Effective date of license or renewal.

(F) Expiration date of license.

(G) Whether license is active or inactive, if known.

(H) Whether license is new or a renewal.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the commissioner shall, upon request of the Franchise Tax Board, furnish to the board either a social security number or an individual taxpayer identification number for individuals licensed under this chapter.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “License” includes a certificate, registration, or any other authorization needed to engage in the insurance business regulated by this code.

(2) “License applicant” means any individual or entity, other than a corporation, in the process of obtaining a license, certificate, registration, or other means to engage in the insurance business regulated by this code.

(3) “Licensee” means any individual or entity, other than a corporation, authorized by a license, certificate, registration, or other means to engage in the insurance business regulated by this code.

(e) The reports required under this section shall be filed on magnetic media or in other machine-readable form, according to standards furnished by the Franchise Tax Board.

(f) The commissioner shall begin providing to the Franchise Tax Board the information required by this section as soon as economically feasible, but no later than July 1, 1987. The information shall be furnished at a time that the Franchise Tax Board may require.

(g) Notwithstanding
 Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, the information furnished pursuant to subdivision (a) and subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of, and paragraph (2) of, subdivision (c) shall not be deemed to be a public record and shall not be open to the public for inspection.

(h) A deputy, agent, clerk, officer, or employee of the commissioner, or any former officer or employee or other individual, hereinafter “employees,” who in the course of the employees’ employment or duty has or has had access to the information required to be furnished under this section, shall not disclose or make known in any manner that information, except as provided in this section.

(1) This section shall not prevent an agency from disclosing or making known
 in any manner that information when the transfer is necessary for the transferee agency to perform its constitutional or statutory duties, and the use is compatible with a purpose for which the information was collected and the use or transfer is accounted for in accordance with Section 1798.25 of the Civil Code.

(2) With respect to information transferred from a law enforcement or regulatory agency, or information transferred to another law enforcement or regulatory agency, a use is compatible if the use of the information requested is needed in an investigation of unlawful activity under the jurisdiction of the requesting agency or for licensing, certification, or regulatory purposes by that agency and on the condition that the law enforcement or regulatory agency requesting the information needed agrees to keep that information confidential
 in accordance with Section 1798.25 of the Civil Code.

(3) A law enforcement or regulatory agency that requests information from the commissioner shall, upon request, identify for the commissioner the intended use for the information. The commissioner shall have the discretion to determine whether to transfer the information to the law enforcement or regulatory agency and shall not transfer the information if the commissioner determines that the information will be used for an improper purpose.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to utilize the social security account number, individual taxpayer identification number, or federal employer identification number for the purpose of establishing the identification of persons affected by state tax laws and,
 to that end, the information furnished pursuant to this section shall be used exclusively for an agency to perform its constitutional or statutory duties.

(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 118.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1667.

Except as provided in Section 1669, a license shall not be denied without an opportunity to the applicant to be heard in support of his application. When a hearing is held, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1668.

The commissioner may deny an application for a license issued pursuant to this chapter if any of the following are true:

(a) The applicant is not properly qualified to perform the duties of a person holding the license for which the applicant applied.

(b) The granting of the license will be against public interest.

(c) The applicant does not intend actively and in good faith to carry on as a business with the general public the transactions that would be permitted by the issuance of the license for which the applicant applied.

(d) The applicant is not of good business reputation.

(e) The applicant is lacking in integrity.

(f) The applicant has been refused a professional, occupational, or vocational license or had a professional, occupational, or vocational license suspended or revoked by a licensing authority for reasons that should preclude the granting of the license for which the applicant applied.

(g) The applicant seeks the license for the purpose of avoiding or preventing the operation or enforcement of the insurance laws of this state.

(h) The applicant has knowingly or willfully made a misstatement in an application to the commissioner for a license, or in a
 document filed in support of that application, or has made a false statement in testimony given under oath before the commissioner or another person acting in the commissioner’s stead.

(i) The applicant has previously engaged in a fraudulent practice or act or has conducted any business in a dishonest manner.

(j) The applicant has shown incompetency or untrustworthiness in the conduct of any business, or has by commission of a wrongful act or practice in the course of any business exposed the public or those dealing with the applicant to the danger of loss.

(k) The applicant has knowingly misrepresented the terms or effect of an insurance policy or contract.

(l) The
 applicant has failed to perform a duty expressly enjoined upon them by this code or has committed an act expressly forbidden by this code.

(m) The applicant has been convicted of any of the following:

(1) A felony.

(2) A misdemeanor specified by this code or other laws regulating insurance.

(3) A public offense having as one of its necessary elements a fraudulent act or an act of dishonesty in acceptance, custody, or payment of money or property.

(n) The applicant has aided or abetted a person in an act or omission that would constitute grounds for the suspension, revocation, or refusal of a
 license or certificate issued under this code to the person aided or abetted.

(o) The applicant has permitted a person in the applicant’s employ to violate this code.

(p) The applicant has violated a law relating to conduct of business that could lawfully be done only under authority conferred by that license.

(q) The applicant has submitted to the commissioner a false or fraudulent certificate pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1749.5.

(r) The applicant has been found liable by clear and convincing evidence in a civil action involving allegations of elder or dependent abuse, oppression, fraud, malice, misappropriation or conversion of funds,
 misrepresentation, or breach of fiduciary duty.

A judgment, plea, or verdict of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 627, Sec. 7.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1668.1.

In addition to the grounds set forth in Section 1668, the following acts shall constitute cause to suspend or revoke any permanent license issued pursuant to this chapter:

(a) The licensee has induced a client, whether directly or indirectly, to cosign or make a loan, make an investment, make a gift, including a testamentary gift, or provide any future benefit through a right of survivorship to the licensee, or to any of the persons listed in subdivision (e).

(b) The licensee has induced a client, whether directly or indirectly, to make the licensee or any of the persons listed in subdivision (e) a beneficiary under the terms of any intervivos or testamentary trust or the owner or beneficiary of a life insurance policy or an annuity policy.

(c) The licensee has induced a client, whether directly or indirectly, to make the licensee, or a person who is registered as a domestic partner of the licensee, or is related to the licensee by birth, marriage, or adoption, a trustee under the terms of any intervivos or testamentary trust. However, if the licensee is also licensed as an attorney in any state, the licensee may be made a trustee under the terms of any intervivos or testamentary trust, provided that the licensee is not a seller of insurance to the trustor of the trust.

(d) The licensee, who has a power of attorney for a client has sold to the client or has used the power of attorney to purchase an insurance product on behalf of the client for which the licensee has received a commission.

(e) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall also apply if the licensee induces the client to provide the benefits in those subdivisions to the following people:

(1) A person who is related to the licensee by birth, marriage, or adoption.

(2) A person who is a friend or business acquaintance of the licensee.

(3) A person who is registered as a domestic partner of the licensee.

(f) This section shall not apply to situations in which the client is:

(1) A person related to the licensee by birth, marriage, or adoption.

(2) A person who is registered as a domestic partner of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 546, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1668.5.

(a) The commissioner may deny an application for a license issued pursuant to this chapter, and may suspend or revoke the permanent license of an organization licensed pursuant to this chapter as authorized by Section 1738, if the applicant or holder of the permanent license is an organization and a controlling person of the organization is any of the following:

(1) The controlling person has previously engaged in a fraudulent practice or act or has conducted any business in a dishonest manner.

(2) The controlling person has shown incompetency or untrustworthiness in the conduct of any business, or has by commission
 of a wrongful act or practice in the course of any business exposed the public or those dealing with the controlling person to the danger of loss.

(3) The controlling person has knowingly misrepresented the terms or effect of an insurance policy or contract.

(4) The controlling person has failed to perform a duty expressly enjoined upon them by a provision of this code or has committed an act expressly forbidden by a provision of this code.

(5) The controlling person has been convicted of any of the following:

(A) A felony.

(B) A misdemeanor specified by this code or other laws regulating
 insurance.

(C) A public offense having as one of its necessary elements a fraudulent act or an act of dishonesty in acceptance, custody, or payment of money or property.

A judgment, plea, or verdict of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(6) The controlling person has aided or abetted a person in an act or omission that would constitute grounds for the suspension, revocation, or refusal of a license or certificate issued under this code to the person aided or abetted.

(7) The controlling person has permitted a person in the controlling person’s employ to violate this code.

(8) The controlling person has violated a law relating to conduct of business that could lawfully be done only under authority conferred by a license under this chapter.

(9) The controlling person has been found liable by clear and convincing evidence in a civil action involving allegations of elder or dependent abuse, oppression, fraud, malice, misappropriation or conversion of funds, misrepresentation, or breach of fiduciary duty.

(b) As used in this section, “controlling person” means a person who possesses, directly or indirectly, the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of the organization, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or
 otherwise, including, but not limited to, power that is the result of an official position with or corporate office held by the person. Control shall be presumed to exist if a person, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds
 proxies representing, more than 10 percent of the voting securities of the organization. This presumption may be rebutted by a showing that control does not exist in fact. The commissioner may, after furnishing all persons in interest notice and opportunity to be heard, determine that control exists in fact, notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to that effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 627, Sec. 8.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1669.

The commissioner may, without hearing, deny an application if the applicant has done one or more of the following:

(a) (1) Been convicted of a felony.

(2) Been convicted of a misdemeanor specified by this code or by other laws regulating insurance.

(3) A judgment, plea, or verdict of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this subdivision.

(b) Had a previous application for a professional, occupational, or vocational license denied for cause by a licensing authority, within five years of the date of the filing of the
 application to be acted upon, on grounds that should preclude the granting of a license by the commissioner under this chapter.

(c) Had a previously issued professional, occupational, or vocational license suspended or revoked for cause by a licensing authority, within five years of the date of the filing of the application to be acted upon, on grounds that should preclude the granting of a license by the commissioner under this chapter.

If the commissioner issues an order based on a plea that does not at any time result in a judgment of conviction, the commissioner shall vacate the order upon petition by the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 13.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1670.

If an applicant for any license under this chapter, Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1800) of this part, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 5, within one year from the date of the receipt by the commissioner of the application, whether or not the filing is complete, or within one year from the date of the issuance to the applicant of a certificate of convenience, if any, whichever is the later date, neither fully qualifies for and receives that license on a permanent basis, nor is denied its issue, the application is automatically denied without prejudice to the filing of a new application for the license unless in a proceeding under a statement of issues the commissioner for good cause determines the denial should be set aside or stayed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 558, Sec. 11.   (AB 487)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1672.

The commissioner may deny an application filed by an organization, unless both the organization and all natural persons named thereon meet the qualifications for the license for which such application is filed, but the qualifying examination shall be administered only to natural persons. In case the application is for more than one natural person to be named thereon and at least one, but not all, of such persons satisfy the examination requirement, the commissioner may issue such license omitting therefrom the names of the person or persons who fail to satisfy the examination requirement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. License Qualification Examinations [1675. - 1684.]

1675.

The following applicants who have theretofore been licensed under this code are exempt from the requirements of this article:

(a) An applicant for a license to act as a property broker-agent or a casualty broker-agent who has been licensed as a property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, or surplus line broker during any part of the license year in which the application is filed or the immediately preceding license year.

(b) An applicant for a license to act as a life agent who has been licensed as a life agent during any part of the license year in which the application is filed or the immediately preceding license year.

(c) An applicant for a license to act
 as an accident and health or sickness agent who has been licensed as an accident and health or sickness agent during any part of the license year in which the application is filed or the immediately preceding license year.

(d) An applicant for a license to act as a travel insurance agent.

(e) An applicant specifically exempted from the particular qualifying examination requirement by other provisions of this code.

(f) (1) A nonresident licensee who applies for a property broker-agent, casualty broker-agent, personal lines broker-agent, or life agent resident license in this state, and who is currently licensed for the same lines of authority in the state of the current resident license, shall not be required to complete an examination. The application shall be received within 90 days of the
 cancellation of the applicant’s resident license and the producer database records, maintained by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, shall indicate that the producer is licensed in good standing for the line of authority requested.

(2) Upon issuance of the California resident license, the examination waiver also applies to adding additional lines of authority to the California resident license provided that the individual was previously licensed in good standing for the requested additional lines of authority, and the application is received within 12 months of the cancellation of the applicant’s previous resident license in another state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 14.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1676.

(a) Except as set forth in Sections 1675 and 1679, the commissioner shall not issue a permanent license pursuant to this chapter to an applicant therefor unless the applicant has within the 12-month period next preceding the date of issue of the license taken and passed the qualifying examination for that license. This section shall not apply to a person licensed as a property broker-agent or as a casualty broker-agent who applies for a license as a personal lines broker-agent.

(b) An application for both the life and accident and health or sickness license types shall meet the requirement in subdivision (a) by passing one examination covering subjects pertaining to both license types. These applicants shall pay the fee for a life agent, as specified in paragraph (4)
 of subdivision (a) of Section 1751.

(c) An applicant for a life license pursuant to Section 1626 or a life license limited to the payment of funeral and burial expenses who is limited by the terms of a written agreement with an insurer that has filed on that life agent’s behalf a notice of appointment with the commissioner to transact only specific life insurance policies or annuities having an initial face amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or less that are designated by the purchaser for the payment of funeral and burial expenses, shall not be required to take the full life agent examination to obtain a license. The applicant shall be required to take an examination developed to test their knowledge of topics relevant to the type of policies that they are restricted to sell.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 15.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1677.

(a) Each qualifying examination for a license pursuant to this chapter shall be in writing and shall be of sufficient scope to satisfy the commissioner that the applicant has sufficient knowledge of, and is reasonably familiar with, the insurance laws of this state and with the provisions, terms, and conditions of the insurance that may be transacted pursuant to the license sought, and that the applicant has a general and fair understanding of the obligations and duties of the holder of that license.

(b) The examination for a license as a life agent, accident and health or sickness agent¸ property broker-agent, and casualty broker-agent shall be provided in English, Spanish, Simplified
 Chinese, Vietnamese, and Korean.

(c) On or after July 1, 2024, the examination for a license as a life agent, accident and health or sickness agent¸ property broker-agent, and casualty broker-agent shall also be provided in Tagalog.

(d) As part of the commissioner’s annual report to the Governor required under Section 12922, the commissioner shall also include the following information:

(1) The number of people taking the Spanish, Simplified Chinese, Vietnamese, Korean, and Tagalog examinations.

(2) The first-time pass rate of the Spanish, Simplified Chinese, Vietnamese, Korean, and Tagalog examinations, including a comparison between the comparable licensing examination taken in English.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 560, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 136, Sec. 1.   (AB 451)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Section operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1678.

The commissioner shall administer qualifying license examinations under this chapter at test centers designated by the commissioner and through online proctored license examinations. The commissioner may give the examinations at more frequent intervals or in other places throughout the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 10.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1679.

(a) A nonresident applicant for a license shall be subject to the same qualifying examination as is required of a resident applicant. The examination may be administered to an eligible nonresident applicant through the insurance authority of the state, territory of the United States, or province of Canada of the applicant’s residence; provided, however, that the commissioner may, in the commissioner’s discretion, enter into a reciprocal arrangement with the officer having supervision of the insurance business in any other state, territory of the United States, or province of Canada whose qualification standards for the applicant to be examined are substantially the same as or in excess of those of this state, to accept, in lieu of the examination
 of an applicant residing therein, a certificate of the officer to the effect that the applicant is licensed in that state, territory of the United States, or province of Canada in a capacity similar to that for which a license is sought in this state and has complied with its qualification standards in respect to all of the following:

(1) Experience or training.

(2) Reasonable familiarity with the broad principles of insurance licensing and regulatory laws and with the provisions, terms, and conditions of the insurance which the applicant proposes to
 transact.

(3) A fair and general understanding of the obligations and duties of a holder of the license sought.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a nonresident applicant who maintains a license in a jurisdiction that grants reciprocity to California residents in accordance with Section 1638.5.

(c) A nonresident applicant for an organizational license shall name at least one person from a state other than California who may exercise the power and perform the duties under their license. Additional persons endorsed to that license may be residents of other states, including California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 10.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1681.

If an applicant fails the qualifying examination, that applicant may, subject to the provisions of Section 1682, retake a qualifying examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 11.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1681.5.

(a) No person shall cheat on, subvert, or attempt to subvert, any licensing examination given by the department, including, but not limited to, engaging in, soliciting, or procuring any of the following:

(1) Any communication between one or more examinees and any other person, other than a proctor or examination official, while the examination is in progress.

(2) The taking of all or a part of the examination by a person other than the applicant.

(3) Possession or use at any time during the examination or while the examinee is on the examination premises of any device, material, or document that is not expressly authorized for use by examinees during the examination, including, but not limited to, notes, crib sheets, textbooks, and electronic devices.

(4) Failure to follow any examination instruction or rule related to examination security.

(5) The provision of false, fraudulent, or materially misleading information concerning education, experience, or other qualifications as part of, or in support of, any application for admission to any examination.

(b) Any person who willfully violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(c) The commissioner shall bar any candidate caught willfully cheating under this section from taking any license examination and from holding an active license under any provision of this code for a period of five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 312, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1682.

(a) (1) A person shall not be admitted to more than 10 license qualification examinations of the same type in any 12-month period.

(2) If a person is admitted to 10 license qualification examinations of the same type in any 12-month period, that person shall not be admitted to another examination of that type until a 12-month period has passed since that 10th examination.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the 12-month period ends at the end of the day immediately preceding the one-year anniversary date of the examination administration in question.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the covered types of license qualification
 examinations are as follows:

(1) The accident and health or sickness agent type examinations, which include both of the following:

(A) The accident and health or sickness agent examination.

(B) The life and accident and health or sickness agent combination examination.

(2) The bail agent examination.

(3) The casualty broker-agent type examinations, which include all of the following:

(A) The casualty broker-agent examination.

(B) The commercial insurance examination.

(C) The property and casualty
 broker-agent combination examination.

(4) The commercial insurance type examinations, which include all of the following:

(A) The commercial insurance examination.

(B) The casualty broker-agent examination.

(C) The property and casualty broker-agent combination examination.

(D) The property broker-agent examination.

(5) The insurance adjuster examination.

(6) The life and disability analyst examination.

(7) The life limited to the payment of funeral and burial expense type examinations, which
 include all of the following:

(A) The life limited to the payment of funeral and burial expense examination.

(B) The life and accident and health or sickness agent combination examination.

(C) The life agent examination.

(8) The life and accident and health or sickness agent combination type examinations, which include all of the following:

(A) The life and accident and health or sickness agent combination examination.

(B) The accident and health or sickness agent examination.

(C) The life limited to the payment of funeral and burial expense examination.

(D) The life agent examination.

(9) The life agent type examinations, which include all of the following:

(A) The life agent examination.

(B) The life and accident and health or sickness agent combination examination.

(C) The life limited to the payment of funeral and burial expense examination.

(10) The limited lines automobile type examinations, which include all of the following:

(A) The limited lines automobile examination.

(B) The personal lines broker-agent examination.

(C) The property and casualty broker-agent combination examination.

(D) The property broker-agent examination.

(11) The personal lines broker-agent type examinations, which include all of the following:

(A) The personal lines broker-agent examination.

(B) The limited lines automobile examination.

(C) The property and casualty broker-agent combination examination.

(D) The property broker-agent examination.

(12) The property broker-agent type examinations, which include all of the following:

(A) The property broker-agent examination.

(B) The commercial insurance examination.

(C) The limited lines automobile examination.

(D) The personal lines broker-agent examination.

(E) The property and casualty broker-agent combination examination.

(13) The property and casualty broker-agent combination type examinations, which include all of the following:

(A) The property and casualty broker-agent combination examination.

(B) The casualty broker-agent examination.

(C) The commercial insurance examination.

(D) The limited lines automobile examination.

(E) The personal lines broker-agent examination.

(F) The property broker-agent examination.

(14) The public insurance adjuster examination.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person who has passed any of the following license qualification examinations shall not be admitted to a subsequent administration of that examination, unless that person is required by the commissioner or applicable law to retake the examination.

(1) The accident and health or sickness agent
 examination.

(2) The bail agent examination.

(3) The casualty broker-agent examination.

(4) The commercial insurance examination.

(5) The insurance adjuster examination.

(6) The life and disability analyst examination.

(7) The life limited to the payment of funeral and burial expense examination.

(8) The life and accident and health or sickness agent combination examination.

(9) The life agent examination.

(10) The limited lines
 automobile examination.

(11) The personal lines broker-agent examination.

(12) The property broker-agent examination.

(13) The property and casualty broker-agent combination examination.

(14) The public insurance adjuster examination.

(d) Except as provided in this article, there is not a limitation on the frequency with which a person may take license qualification examinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 17.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1683.

An applicant shall schedule or reschedule the applicant’s qualifying examination using an electronic service approved by the commissioner. If an applicant fails to appear at the time and place set for the examination, the applicant shall be deemed to have failed the examination. If the applicant fails the qualifying examination, the commissioner shall give
 the applicant written notice thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 12.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1684.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, whenever reference is made in this article to an applicant for a license, such reference includes each natural person who applies to be named on the license of an organization, and wherever reference is made to a person who has been licensed in a specified capacity, such reference shall also apply to a person named to act in such capacity under the license of an organization.
